Illinois, session 104th, SB3268.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Residential Automated Solar Permitting Platform Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Baseline residential code" means an edition of the 8International Residential Code for One and Two-Family 9Dwellings first published by the International Code Council 10during the current year or preceding calendar years excluding 11Parts IV and VII.12    "Residential automated solar permitting platform" means 13software or a combination of software that automates plan 14review, automatically produces code-compliant approvals, 15accepts online payments for permitting fees if permitting fees 16are levied, and instantly issues permits and permit revisions 17for residential photovoltaic systems upon online submission of 18permitting fee payments, if permitting fees are levied, and a 19code-compliant application. The residential automated solar 20permitting platform must be available for residential 21photovoltaic systems up to the maximum capacity allowed with a 22200-amp main service disconnect and installed to the 23requirements of the baseline residential code that may include   SB3268- 2 -LRB104 18404 JRC 31846 b1an energy storage system up to the maximum capacity allowed 2under the baseline residential code, a main panel upgrade, or 3a main breaker derate. 4    Section 10. Adoption of platform. On or before July 1, 52027, municipalities and counties with a population of more 6than 10,000 residents must adopt a residential automated solar 7permitting platform. The municipality or county must 8anticipate that the residential automated solar permitting 9platform will have the capability to process at least 75% of 10residential solar applications on existing construction 11submitted to authorities having jurisdiction in the State.12    For a solar photovoltaic system approved by a platform 13under this Section, municipalities and counties may only 14require manual inspection before issuing a permit if a safety 15issue is identified during the remote inspection or automatic 16permitting process. Manual inspections may not unreasonably 17delay permitting of the residential photovoltaic system but 18this does not preclude an inspector from examining 19construction documents. 20    Section 15. Over the counter permitting. A county or 21municipality that offers same-day in-person permitting for all 22residential solar applications is exempt from the requirements 23in Section 10.   SB3268- 3 -LRB104 18404 JRC 31846 b1    Section 20. Reporting. On or before July 1, 2027, 2municipalities with a population of more than 10,000 residents 3and all counties must include on their websites the 4availability of a residential automated solar permitting 5platform and how to access it. 6    Section 25. Remedies.7    (a) A person or entity aggrieved by a violation of this Act 8or any rule adopted under this Act by a municipality or county 9may file a civil action in the county in which the alleged 10offense occurred or where any person who is party to the action 11resides. Exhaustion of any alternative administrative remedies 12provided in this Act are not required before a civil action may 13be filed. Actions may be brought by one or more persons or 14entities for and on behalf of themselves and other persons 15similarly situated. A person or entity whose rights have been 16violated under this Act by a municipality or county is 17entitled to collect:18        (1) in the case of unlawful retaliation, all legal or 19    equitable relief as may be appropriate; and20        (2) attorney's fees and costs.21    (b) The right of an interested party or aggrieved person 22to bring an action under this Act terminates after 3 years from 23the date that a person or entity requested a permit for a 24residential photovoltaic system. This limitation period is 25tolled if a municipality or county has deterred a person's   SB3268- 4 -LRB104 18404 JRC 31846 b1exercise of rights under this Act. 2    Section 30. Remote inspections. On or before July 1 2028, 3municipalities with a population of more than 10,000 residents 4and all counties must provide an option for remote inspections 5via recorded video or photo that can be submitted 6electronically for projects permitted by the residential 7automated solar permitting platform. These inspections must be 8offered at no greater cost and be available with no greater 9delay than in-person inspections. A municipality or county may 10require no more than one inspection for projects permitted by 11the automated solar permitting software unless the first 12inspection failed. A municipality or county that does not 13require a permit for residential photovoltaic solar and 14storage systems is exempt from the requirements in this 15Section.